Utah statutes.
77-23b-1.   Definitions.

(1)  As used in this chapter, "remote computing service" means provision to the public of computer storage or processing services by means of an electronic communications system.

(2)  The definitions of terms in Section 77-23a-3 apply to this chapter.

